Wisconsin, session 2025, SB199.
do enact as follows:SB199,11Section 1. 39.535 of the statutes is created to read:SB199,2,4239.535 Reporting data related to student costs and outcomes. (1) 3Definition. In this section, “institution of higher education” means any of the 4following:SB199,2,65(a) An institution, as defined in s. 36.05 (9), including all branch campuses 6associated with the institution.SB199,2,87(b) A technical college under ch. 38, including all campuses governed by the 8same technical college district board.SB199,2,99(c) A private institution, as defined in s. 39.49 (1) (e).SB199,2,1310(2) Annual reporting by institutions. (a) An institution of higher 11education shall collect and, by July 1, 2027, and each July 1 thereafter, report to the 12board all of the following information relating to its undergraduate degree 13programs:SB199,3,1011. The average salary of the institution’s graduates 6 months after 2graduation, stated both in the aggregate and segregated by major. In addition, 3every 5th year, beginning no later than July 1, 2032, the annual report shall include 4the average salary of the institution's graduates 5 years after graduation, stated 5both in the aggregate and segregated by major. The institution, to the best of its 6ability, shall further identify every 5th year, for each major, the percentage of 7graduates in the major who are employed 5 years after graduation in the field of 8their major, the average salary of these graduates employed in the field of their 9major, and the average salary of the graduates not employed in the field of their 10major.SB199,3,13112. The average debt of the institution’s students upon the student’s 12graduation or discontinuation of studies at the institution for reasons other than 13transfer, stated both in the aggregate and segregated by major. SB199,3,15143. The institution’s graduation rate, stated both in the aggregate and 15segregated by major.SB199,3,16164. The institution’s annual total cost of attendance and average net cost.SB199,3,17175. The financial aid available to the institution’s students.SB199,3,18186. The 10 most popular degree programs offered by the institution.SB199,3,2319(b) To the extent possible, an institution of higher education shall report 20information under par. (a) using the same methodology that applies to the same or 21similar information provided by the institution under 20 USC 1091 (a) and 34 CFR 22668.41 to 668.45, but the term “major” in par. (a) is not synonymous with the term 23“field of study.”SB199,4,41(c) To the extent information under par. (a) is not required to be provided by 2an institution of higher education under 20 USC 1091 (a) and 34 CFR 668.41 to 3668.45, the institution shall use reasonable methods to collect the information, 4including gathering the information from alumni surveys or other relevant sources.SB199,4,75(d) If an institution of higher education does not have information available 6for all periods specified in par. (a) 1., the institution shall report the information 7required under par. (a) 1. for the periods for which information is available.SB199,4,98(e) An institution of higher education shall submit reports under this 9subsection in the form and format prescribed by the board.SB199,4,1310(3) Board duties. (a) In cooperation with the department of workforce 11development, the board shall prepare a list of the 50 most in-demand jobs in this 12state, including the average starting salary and required education level for each 13job. The board shall make this list publicly available on the board’s website.SB199,4,1814(b) From the reports received by the board under sub. (2), the board shall 15incorporate the data into an electronic document formatted in a manner that 16facilitates comparison of information among institutions of higher education. The 17board shall annually provide this electronic document, with the list under par. (a), 18to the department of public instruction.SB199,219Section 2. 115.28 (59) (am) of the statutes is created to read:SB199,5,220115.28 (59) (am) Beginning in the 2027-28 school year, annually provide the 21electronic document received from the higher educational aids board under s. 2239.535 (3) (b) to school boards and ensure that every school board provides the 1electronic document to pupils in grades 11 and 12 in the school district as part of 2the academic and career planning services required under par. (a).SB199,5,33